Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 13.1-801.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the Virginia Nonstock Corporation Act or the “Act.”

History.

Code 1950, §

13.1-201

; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925.

Editor’s note.

As to the repeal of Chapters 1 and 2 of this title and the enactment of Chapters 9, 10, and 11 in lieu thereof, see the Editor’s note under §

13.1-601

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 added “or the ‘Act”’ at the end.

Law Review.

For survey on business and corporate law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 491 (1989).

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

For 2002 survey of Virginia technology law, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 341 (2002).

For comment, “Corporate Personhood and Nonprofit Director Duty of Obedience: Legal Implications that Necessitate Expanded Standing to Sue,” see 23 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 165 (2015).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, §§ 2, 4.

§ 13.1-802.
Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The General Assembly shall have power to amend or repeal all or part of this Act at any time, and all domestic and foreign corporations subject to this Act shall be governed by the amendment or repeal.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-291; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 deleted “of Virginia” following “General Assembly” and substituted “Act” for “chapter” in two places.

§ 13.1-803.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Articles of incorporation”
means all documents constituting, at any particular time, the charter of a corporation. It includes the original charter issued by the General Assembly, a court or the Commission and all amendments including certificates of merger, consolidation, or correction. When the articles of incorporation have been restated pursuant to any articles of restatement, amendment, domestication, or merger, it includes only the restated articles of incorporation without the accompanying articles of restatement, amendment, domestication, or merger. When used with respect to a foreign corporation, the “articles of incorporation” of such entity means the document that is equivalent to the articles of incorporation of a domestic corporation.

“Board of directors”
means the group of persons vested with the management of the business of the corporation irrespective of the name by which such group is designated, and “director” means a member of the board of directors.

“Certificate,”
when relating to articles filed with the Commission, means the order of the Commission that makes the articles effective, together with the articles.

“Commission”
means the State Corporation Commission of Virginia.

“Conspicuous”
means so written, displayed, or presented that a reasonable person against whom the writing is to operate should have noticed it. For example, text that is italicized, is in boldface, contrasting colors, or capitals, or is underlined is conspicuous.

“Corporation”
or

“domestic corporation”

means a corporation not authorized by law to issue shares, irrespective of the nature of the business to be transacted, organized under this chapter or existing pursuant to the laws of the Commonwealth on January 1, 1986, or that, by virtue of articles of incorporation, amendment, or merger, has become a domestic corporation of the Commonwealth, even though also being a corporation organized under laws other than the laws of the Commonwealth or that has become a domestic corporation of the Commonwealth pursuant to Article 11.1 (§

13.1-898.1:1

et seq.).

“Deliver”
or

“delivery”

means any method of delivery used in conventional commercial practice, including delivery by hand, mail, commercial delivery, and, if authorized in accordance with §

13.1-810

, by electronic transmission.

“Disinterested director”
means a director who, at the time action is to be taken under §

13.1-871

,

13.1-878

, or

13.1-880

, does not have (i) a financial interest in a matter that is the subject of such action or (ii) a familial, financial, professional, employment, or other relationship with a person who has a financial interest in the matter, either of which would reasonably be expected to affect adversely the objectivity of the director when participating in the action, and if the action is to be taken under §

13.1-878

or

13.1-880

, is also not a party to the proceeding. The presence of one or more of the following circumstances shall not by itself prevent a person from being a disinterested director: (a) nomination or election of the director to the current board by any person, acting alone or participating with others, who is so interested in the matter or (b) service as a director of another corporation of which an interested person is also a director.

“Document”
means (i) any tangible medium on which information is inscribed, and includes any writing or written instrument, or (ii) an electronic record.

“Domestic,”
with respect to an entity, means an entity governed as to its internal affairs by the organic law of the Commonwealth.

“Domestic business trust”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1201

.

“Domestic limited liability company”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1002

.

“Domestic limited partnership”
has the same meaning as specified in §

50-73.1

.

“Domestic partnership”
means an association of two or more persons to carry on as co-owners of a business for profit formed under §

50-73.88

or predecessor law of the Commonwealth and includes, for all purposes of the laws of the Commonwealth, a registered limited liability partnership.

“Domestic stock corporation”
has the same meaning as “domestic corporation” as specified in §

13.1-603

.

“Effective date,”
when referring to a document for which effectiveness is contingent upon issuance of a certificate by the Commission, means the time and date determined in accordance with §

13.1-806

.

“Effective date of notice”
is defined in §

13.1-810

.

“Electronic”
means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Electronic record”
means information that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in paper form through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice, unless otherwise authorized in accordance with subsection J of §

13.1-810

.

“Electronic transmission”
or

“electronically transmitted”

means any form or process of communication, not directly involving the physical transfer of paper or other tangible medium, that (i) is suitable for the retention, retrieval, and reproduction of information by the recipient, and (ii) is retrievable in paper form by the recipient through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice, unless otherwise authorized in accordance with subsection J of §

13.1-810

.

“Eligible entity”
means a domestic or foreign unincorporated entity or a domestic or foreign stock corporation.

“Eligible interests”
means interests or shares.

“Employee”
includes, unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, an officer but not a director. A director may accept duties that make the director also an employee.

“Entity”
includes any domestic or foreign corporation; any domestic or foreign stock corporation; any domestic or foreign unincorporated entity; any estate or trust; and any state, the United States, and any foreign government.

“Entity conversion”
means conversion. A certificate of entity conversion is the same as a certificate of conversion.

“Foreign,”
with respect to an entity, means an entity governed as to its internal affairs by the organic law of a jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth.

“Foreign business trust”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1201

.

“Foreign corporation”
means a corporation not authorized by law to issue shares, organized under laws other than the laws of the Commonwealth.

“Foreign limited liability company”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1002

.

“Foreign limited partnership”
has the same meaning as specified in §

50-73.1

.

“Foreign partnership”
means an association of two or more persons to carry on as co-owners of a business for profit formed under the laws of any state or jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth, and includes, for all purposes of the laws of the Commonwealth, a foreign registered limited liability partnership.

“Foreign registered limited liability partnership”
has the same meaning as specified in §

50-73.79

.

“Foreign stock corporation”
has the same meaning as “foreign corporation” as specified in §

13.1-603

.

“Foreign unincorporated entity”
means a foreign partnership, foreign limited liability company, foreign limited partnership, or foreign business trust.

“Government subdivision”
includes authority, county, district, and municipality.

“Includes”
denotes a partial definition.

“Incorporation surrender”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-898.1:1

. A certificate of incorporation surrender is the same as a certificate of domestication.

“Individual”
means a natural person.

“Interest”
means either or both of the following rights under the organic law of a foreign or domestic unincorporated entity:

The right to receive distributions from the entity either in the ordinary course or upon liquidation; or

The right to receive notice or vote on issues involving its internal affairs, other than as an agent, assignee, proxy, or person responsible for managing its business and affairs.“Jurisdiction of formation” means the state or country the law of which includes the organic law governing a domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity.“Means” denotes an exhaustive definition.“Member” means one having a membership interest in a corporation in accordance with the provisions of its articles of incorporation or bylaws.“Membership interest” means the interest of a member in a domestic or foreign corporation, including voting and all other rights associated with membership.“Organic document” means the document, if any, that is filed of public record to create an unincorporated entity. Where an organic document has been amended or restated, the term means the organic document as last amended or restated.“Organic law” means the statute governing the internal affairs of a domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity.“Person” includes an individual and an entity.“Principal office” means the office, in or out of the Commonwealth, where the principal executive offices of a domestic or foreign corporation are located, or, if there are no such offices, the office, in or out of the Commonwealth, so designated by the board of directors. The designation of the principal office in the most recent annual report filed pursuant to §

13.1-936

shall be conclusive for purposes of this chapter.“Proceeding” includes civil suit and criminal, administrative and investigatory action conducted by a governmental agency.“Protected series” has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1002

.“Record date” means the date established under Article 7 (§

13.1-837

et seq.) of this chapter on which a corporation determines the identity of its members and their membership interests for purposes of this chapter. The determination shall be made as of the close of business at the principal office of the corporation on the record date unless another time for doing so is specified when the record date is fixed.“Registered limited liability partnership” has the same meaning as specified in §

50-73.79

.“Shares” has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-603

.“Sign” or “signature” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a document: (i) to execute or adopt a tangible symbol to a document, and includes any manual, facsimile, or conformed signature; or (ii) to attach to or logically associate with an electronic transmission an electronic sound, symbol, or process, and includes an electronic signature in an electronic transmission.“State” when referring to a part of the United States, includes a state, commonwealth, and the District of Columbia, and their agencies and governmental subdivisions; and a territory or insular possession, and their agencies and governmental subdivisions, of the United States.“Transact business” includes the conduct of affairs by any corporation that is not organized for profit.“Unincorporated entity” or “domestic unincorporated entity” means a domestic partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, or business trust.“United States” includes any district, authority, bureau, commission, department, or any other agency of the United States.“Voting group” means all members of one or more classes that under the articles of incorporation or this chapter are entitled to vote and be counted together collectively on a matter at a meeting of members. All members entitled by the articles of incorporation or this chapter to vote generally on the matter are for that purpose a single voting group.“Voting power” means the current power to vote in the election of directors.“Writing” or “written” means any information in the form of a document.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-202; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 1997, c. 801; 2002, c. 285; 2007, c. 925; 2010, c. 171; 2012, c. 706; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487; 2022, c. 82.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1997, c. 801, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 1998. The powers granted and duties imposed pursuant to this act shall apply prospectively to guardians and conservators appointed by court order entered on or after that date, or modified on or after that date if the court so directs, without regard to when the petition was filed. The procedures specified in this act governing proceedings for appointment of a guardian or conservator or termination or other modification of a guardianship shall apply on and after that date without regard to when the petition therefor was filed or the guardianship or conservatorship created.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 1997 amendment,

effective January 1, 1998, substituted “incapacitated” for “incompetent” in the paragraph defining “Individual.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 285, in the paragraph defining “Articles of incorporation,” substituted “merger, consolidation or correction” for “merger or consolidation” at the end of the second sentence; inserted the paragraph defining “Electronic transmission”; and in the paragraph defining “Entity,” substituted “stock corporation” for “nonstock corporation.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 rewrote the section.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 171, in the paragraph defining “conspicuous,” substituted “so written, displayed, or presented” for “written so” in the first sentence and “text that is italicized, is in boldface contrasting colors, or capitals, or is” for “printing in italics or boldface or contrasting color or typing in capitals or” in the last sentence; inserted “if authorized in accordance with §

13.1-810

, by” near the end in the paragraph defining “Deliver” or “delivery”; added the paragraphs defining “Document,” “Electronic,” “Electronic record,” “Sign,” and “Writing”; and rewrote the paragraph defining “Electronic transmission.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 706 rewrote the definition of “State,” which read: “‘State’ when referring to a part of the United States, includes any state or commonwealth, any territory or insular possession of the United States, and any of their agencies and governmental subdivisions.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “this chapter” for “this Act” throughout the section; inserted “unless the context requires a different meaning” in the introductory language; in the definition of “Articles of incorporation,” added the last sentence; substituted “(§

13.1-898.1:1

et seq.)” for “(§

13.1-898.2

et seq.) of this Act” in the definition of “Corporation”; inserted definitions of “Domestic,” “Effective date,” “Foreign,” “Jurisdiction of formation,” “Protected series,” and “Registered limited liability partnership”; and substituted “a foreign partnership, foreign limited liability company, foreign limited partnership, or foreign business trust” for “an unincorporated entity whose internal affairs are governed by an organic law of a jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth” in the definition of “Foreign unincorporated entity”; and made stylistic changes. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 82 added the definitions of “Entity conversion” and “Incorporation surrender.”

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

§ 13.1-804.
Filing requirements.

A document shall satisfy the requirements of this section, and of any other section that adds to or varies these requirements, to be entitled to be filed with the Commission.

The document shall be one that this Act requires or permits to be filed with the Commission.

The document shall contain the information required by this Act. It may contain other information as well.

The document shall be typewritten or printed or, if electronically transmitted, shall be in a format that can be retrieved or reproduced in typewritten or printed form. The typewritten or printed portion shall be in black. Photocopies, or other reproduced copies, of typewritten or printed documents may be filed. In every case, information in the document shall be legible and the document shall be capable of being reformatted and reproduced in copies of archival quality.

The document shall be in the English language. A corporate name need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals. The articles of incorporation, duly authenticated by the official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law the corporation is incorporated, which are required of foreign corporations need not be in English if accompanied by a reasonably authenticated English translation.

The document shall be signed in the name of the domestic or foreign corporation:

By the chairman or any vice-chairman of the board of directors, the president, or any other of its officers authorized to act on behalf of the corporation;

If directors have not been selected or the corporation has not been formed, by an incorporator; or

If the corporation is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

Any annual report required to be filed by §

13.1-936

shall be signed in the name of the corporation by an officer or director listed in the report or, if the corporation is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

The person signing the document shall state beneath or opposite his signature his name and the capacity in which he signs. Any signature may be a facsimile. The document may but need not contain a corporate seal, attestation, acknowledgment, or verification.

If, pursuant to any provision of this Act, the Commission has prescribed a mandatory form for the document, the document shall be in or on the prescribed form.

The document shall be delivered to the Commission for filing and shall be accompanied by the required filing fee, and any charter or entrance fee or registration fee required by this Act.

The Commission may accept the electronic filing of any information required or permitted to be filed by this Act and may prescribe the methods of execution, recording, reproduction and certification of electronically filed information pursuant to § 59.1-496.

Whenever a provision of this Act permits any of the terms of a plan or a filed document to be dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan or filed document, the following provisions apply:

The plan or filed document shall specify the nationally recognized news or information medium in which the facts may be found or otherwise state the manner in which the facts can be objectively ascertained. The manner in which the facts will operate upon the terms of the plan or filed document shall be set forth in the plan or filed document.

The facts may include:

Any of the following that are available in a nationally recognized news or information medium either in print or electronically: statistical or market indices, market prices of any security or group of securities, interest rates, currency exchange rates, or similar economic or financial data;

A determination or action by any person or body, including the corporation or any other party to a plan or filed document; or

The terms of or actions taken under an agreement to which the corporation is a party, or any other agreement or document.

The number of members and designation of each class of members;

The effective date of a filed document; and

Any required statement in a filed document of the date on which the underlying transaction was approved or the manner in which that approval was given.

As used in this subsection:

The following terms of a plan or filed document may not be made dependent on facts outside the plan or filed document:

If a term of a filed document is made dependent on a fact objectively ascertainable outside of the filed document and that fact is not objectively ascertainable by reference to a source described in subdivision 2a or to a document that is a matter of public record, or if the affected members have not received notice of the fact from the corporation, then the corporation shall file with the Commission articles of amendment setting forth the fact promptly after the time when the fact referred to is first objectively ascertainable or thereafter changes. Articles of amendment under this subdivision are deemed to be authorized by the authorization of the original filed document or plan to which they relate and may be filed by the corporation without further action by the board of directors or the members.

The provisions of subdivisions 1, 2, and 5 of this subsection shall not be considered by the Commission in deciding whether the terms of a plan or filed document comply with the requirements of law.

a.

“Filed document” means a document filed with the Commission under §

13.1-819

or Article 10 (§

13.1-884

et seq.) or 11 (§

13.1-893.1

et seq.) of this Act; and

b.

“Plan” means a plan of merger.

a.

The name and address of any person required in a filed document;

b.

The registered office of any entity required in a filed document;

c.

The registered agent of any entity required in a filed document;

History.

1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 231; 1995, c. 70; 2000, c. 995; 2007, c. 925; 2010, c. 171; 2015, c. 623.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “13.1-893.1” was substituted for “13.1-894” in subdivision
L 3 a.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 995 added “pursuant to § 59.1-496” at the end of subsection K.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “Act” for “chapter” in subsections B, C and I; added the language beginning “or, if electronically transmitted” at the end of the first sentence in subsection D; deleted “or” following “board of directors” in subdivision F 1; rewrote subsection H; substituted “Act” for “chapter or by §

13.1-936.1

” at the end of subsection J; and added subsection L.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 171 twice substituted “signed” for “executed” in subsections F and G; inserted “domestic or foreign” near the end in the introductory paragraph of subsection F; and substituted “signing the document shall state” for “executing the document shall sign it and state” in the first sentence of subsection H.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 inserted “or, if the corporation is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary” in subsection G.

Law Review.

For 1994 survey of Virginia business and corporate law, see 28 U. Rich. L. Rev. 923 (1994).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 149.

§ 13.1-804.1.
Filing with the Commission pursuant to reorganization.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in §

13.1-804

,

13.1-819

,

13.1-896

, or

13.1-904

, whenever, pursuant to any applicable statute of the United States relating to reorganizations of corporations, a plan of reorganization of a corporation has been confirmed by the decree or order of a court of competent jurisdiction, the corporation may, without action by the board of directors or members to carry out the plan of reorganization ordered or decreed by such court of competent jurisdiction under federal statute, put into effect and carry out the plan and decrees of the court relative thereto (i) through an amendment or amendments to the corporation’s articles of incorporation containing terms and conditions permitted by this Act, (ii) through a plan of merger, or (iii) through dissolution.

The individual or individuals designated by the court shall file with the Commission articles of amendment, merger, or dissolution, which, in addition to the matters otherwise required or permitted by law to be set forth therein, shall set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The text of each amendment, plan of merger, or dissolution approved by the court;

The date of the court’s order or decree approving the articles of amendment, plan of merger, or dissolution;

The title of the reorganization proceeding in which the order or decree was entered; and

A statement that the court had jurisdiction of the proceeding under federal statute.

If the Commission finds that the articles of amendment, merger, or dissolution comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of amendment, merger, or dissolution.

This section does not apply after entry of a final decree in the reorganization proceeding even though the court retains jurisdiction of the proceeding for limited purposes unrelated to consummation of the reorganization plan.

History.

2007, c. 925.

§ 13.1-805.
Issuance of certificate by Commission; recordation of documents.

Whenever this chapter conditions the effectiveness of a document upon the issuance of a certificate by the Commission to evidence the effectiveness of the document, the Commission shall by order issue the certificate if it finds that the document complies with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid. The Commission shall admit any such certificate to record in its office.

Whenever the Commission is directed to admit any document to record in its office, it shall cause it to be spread upon its record books or to be recorded or reproduced in any other manner the Commission may deem suitable. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Commission may furnish information from and provide access to any of its records by any means the Commission may deem suitable.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-288; 1956, c. 428; 1982, c. 375; 1984, c. 295; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 231; 1987, c. 183; 1988, c. 405; 1989, c. 152.

Law Review.

For survey on business and corporate law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 491 (1989).

§ 13.1-806.
Effective time and date of document.

Except as otherwise provided in §

13.1-807

, a certificate issued by the Commission is effective at the time such certificate is issued, unless the certificate relates to articles filed with the Commission and the articles state that the certificate shall become effective at a later time or date specified in the articles. In that event the certificate shall become effective at the earlier of the time and date so specified or 11:59 p.m. on the fifteenth day after the date on which the certificate is issued by the Commission. If a delayed effective date is specified, but no time is specified, the effective time shall be 12:01 a.m. on the date specified. Any other document filed with the Commission shall be effective when accepted for filing unless otherwise provided for in this chapter.

Notwithstanding subsection A, any certificate that has a delayed effective time or date shall not become effective if, prior to the effective time and date, a statement of cancellation signed by each party to the articles to which the certificate relates is delivered to the Commission for filing. If the Commission finds that the statement of cancellation complies with the requirements of law, it shall, by order, cancel the certificate.

A statement of cancellation shall contain:

The name of the corporation;

The name of the articles and the date on which the articles were filed with the Commission;

The time and date on which the Commission’s certificate becomes effective; and

A statement that the articles are being canceled in accordance with this section.

Notwithstanding subsection A, for purposes of §§

13.1-829

and

13.1-924

, any certificate that has a delayed effective date shall be deemed to be effective when the certificate is issued.

For articles with a delayed effective date and time, the effective date and time shall be Eastern Time.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Cross references.

As to effective date of articles of domestication, see §

13.1-898.4

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925, in subsection A, substituted “is effective” for “becomes effective” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, inserted “earlier of the” preceding “time and date” and substituted “or 11:59 p.m. on the 15th day” for “so long as the effective date is not more than fifteen days” and substituted “Act” for “chapter” in the last sentence; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, inserted the exception at the beginning and substituted “or date specified” for “and date specified” in the first sentence,
added the third sentence, and substituted “chapter” for “Act” at the end; rewrote subsection B, which read: “Notwithstanding subsection A, any certificate that has a delayed effective time and date shall not become effective if, prior to the effective time and date, the parties to the articles to which the certificate relates file a request for cancellation with the Commission and the Commission, by order, cancels the certificate”; inserted subsection C and redesignated former subsection C as subsection D; added subsection E; and made stylistic changes. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-807.
Correcting filed articles.

Articles filed with the Commission may be corrected if (i) the articles contain an inaccuracy; (ii) the articles were not properly authorized or defectively signed, attested, sealed, verified, or acknowledged; or (iii) the electronic transmission of the articles to the Commission was defective.

Articles are corrected by filing with the Commission articles of correction that:

Set forth the name of the corporation prior to filing;

Describe the articles to be corrected, including their effective date;

Specify the inaccuracy or defect to be corrected;

Correct the inaccuracy or defect; and

State that the board of directors authorized the correction and the date of such authorization.

If the Commission finds that the articles of correction comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of correction. Upon the issuance of a certificate of correction by the Commission, the articles of correction shall become effective as of the effective date and time of the articles they correct except as to persons relying on the uncorrected articles and adversely affected by the correction. As to those persons, articles of correction are effective upon the issuance of the certificate of correction.

No articles of correction shall be accepted by the Commission when received more than 30 days after the effective date of the certificate relating to the articles to be corrected.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925; 2008, cc. 91, 509; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 rewrote subsections A and B; inserted “and time” following “effective date” in the first sentence of subsection C; and substituted “may be filed with the Commission more than 30 days” for “shall be accepted by the Commission when received more than nine days” in subsection D.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 91 substituted “were not properly authorized or defectively executed” for “were defectively executed” in clause (ii) of subsection A; and substituted “inaccurate or defective matter” for “inaccuracy and defect” in subdivisions B 3 and B 4.

The 2008 amendment by c. 509 substituted “shall be accepted by the Commission when received” for “may be filed with the Commission” in subsection D.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, deleted ‘‘The board of directors of a corporation may authorize correction of any’’ at the beginning, inserted ‘‘may be corrected’’ and in clause (ii), substituted ‘‘signed’’ for ‘‘executed’’; rewrote subsection B; and inserted the first sentence in subsection C. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 13.1-808.
Evidentiary effect of copy of filed document.

A certificate attached to a copy of any document admitted to the records of the Commission, bearing the signature of the clerk of the Commission or a member of the staff of the office of the clerk, which in either case may be in facsimile, and the seal of the Commission, which may be in facsimile, is conclusive evidence that the document has been admitted to the records of the Commission.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 deleted “or an assistant clerk” following “clerk” and inserted “or a member of the staff of the office of the clerk, which in either case may be in facsimile” preceding “and the seal” and “which may be in facsimile” preceding “is conclusive evidence.”